Utah statutes.
58-69-201.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Dentist and Dental Hygienist Licensing Board, consisting of six licensed dentists, two licensed dental hygienists, and one member of the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3) (a)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.

(b)  In addition, the board shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:

(i)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and

(ii)  advise the division with respect to the conduct of investigations of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding concerning the complaint.

(5)  Board members may serve as examiners for licensing examinations established under Section 58-69-302 when requested by the examining body.

(6)  Board members serving as examiners shall be compensated in accordance with Subsection 58-1-201(4), but may not be compensated for per diem or allowable expenses if they are eligible to receive compensation from the examining body.

